Arkansas, session 2025, HB1891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-10-103(f)(1)(B)(ii), concerning the
requirement for filing as a candidate, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) A candidate may use as the prefix the title of
a nonpartisan judicial office in an election for a nonpartisan judicial
office only if:
*JLL350*
03/20/2025 3:57:53 PM JLL350

HB1891
(a) The candidate is currently serving in a
judicial position to which the candidate has been elected in the last
election for the office; or
(b) The candidate:
(1) Is a candidate for the office of
Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge,
or district judge;
(2) Is currently serving in the position
of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit
judge, or district judge as an appointee; and
(3) Has been serving in that position
for at least twelve (12) months.
























03/20/2025 3:57:53 PM JLL350